tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Ofis Aletleri > Ofis Pulları: Adres Pulları; Tarih Damgaları; Kabartma Pulları; Noter Pulları; Pasaport Pulları; Posta Pulları; İmza Pulları; Vintage Pullar
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Офисные принадлежности > Офисные штампы и печати: Адресные штампы; Датеры; Рельефные печати; Печати для нотариусов; Штампы для паспортов; Почтовые штампы; Факсимиле; Винтажные штампы
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Όργανα γραφείου > Σφραγίδες γραφείου: Σφραγίδες διευθύνσεων; Σφραγίδες ημερομηνίας; Ανάγλυφες σφραγίδες; Σφραγίδες συμβολαιογράφου; Σφραγίδες διαβατηρίων; Γραμματόσημα; Σφραγίδες υπογραφής; Σφραγίδες Vintage
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kancelárske nástroje > Kancelárske pečiatky: Pečiatky adresy; Pečiatky dátumu; Embosovacie pečiatky; Notárske pečiatky; Pečiatky do pasov; Poštové známky; Podpisové pečiatky; Staré poštové známky
da: Kontorforsyning > Kontorredskaber > Kontorstempler: Adressestempler; Datostempler; Prægningsstempler; Notarstempler; Passtempler; Frimærker; Signaturstempler; Vintage-stempler
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Instrumente de birou > Ștampile de birou: Ștampile cu adrese; Ștampile cu dată; Ștampile pentru gofrare; Ștampile notariale; Ștampile pentru pașapoarte; Timbre; Ștampile cu semnătura; Timbre de epocă
it: Forniture per ufficio > Strumenti per ufficio > Francobolli per ufficio: Timbri con indirizzo; Timbri con data; Timbri in rilievo; Timbri notarili; Timbri per passaporto; Francobolli; Timbri firmati; Francobolli d'epoca
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 办公文具 > 办公章: 地址印章; 日期印章; 压花印章; 公证章; 护照印章; 邮票; 签名印章; 复古印章
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Офис инструменти > Офис печати: Печати с адрес; Печати с дата; Релефни печати; Нотариални печати; Паспортни печати; Пощенски марки; Печати с подпис; Винтидж печати
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Dụng cụ văn phòng > Con dấu văn phòng: Con dấu địa chỉ; Con dấu ngày tháng; Con dấu dập nổi; Con dấu công chứng; Con dấu hộ chiếu; Tem bưu chính; Con dấu chữ ký; Tem cổ điển
hu: Irodai kellékek > Irodai eszközök > Irodai bélyegzők: Címbélyegzők; Dátumbélyegzők; Dombornyomó bélyegzők; Közjegyzői bélyegzők; Útlevélbélyegzők; Postai bélyegzők; Aláírási bélyegzők; Régi bélyegzők
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Biuro instrumentai > Biuro antspaudai: Adreso antspaudai; Datos antspaudai; Reljefiniai antspaudai; Notaro antspaudai; Paso antspaudai; Pašto ženklai; Parašo antspaudai; Senoviniai pašto ženklai
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Akcesoria biurowe > Pieczątki biurowe: Pieczątki adresowe; Datowniki; Stemple do wytłaczania; Pieczęcie notarialne; Pieczątki paszportowe; Znaczki pocztowe; Pieczątki z podpisem (faksymile); Pieczątki vintage
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Kontorsinstrument > Kontorsstämplar: Adresstämplar; Datumstämplar; Präglingsstämplar; Notariestämplar; Passtämplar; Frimärken; Signaturstämplar; Gamla stämplar
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistovälineet > Toimistoleimasimet: Osoiteleimasimet; Päivämääräleimasimet; Kohokuviointileimasimet; Notaarin leimasimet; Passileimasimet; Postimerkit; Allekirjoitusleimasimet; Vintage-leimasimet
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářské nástroje > Kancelářská razítka: Adresová razítka; Datumová razítka; Embosovací razítka; Notářská razítka; Pasová razítka; Poštovní známky; Podpisová razítka; Vintage razítka
es: Material de oficina > Artículos de oficina > Sellos de oficina: Sellos de dirección; Sellos de fecha; Sellos en relieve; Sellos de notario; Sellos de pasaporte; Sellos postales; Sellos de firma; Sellos vintage
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Accessoires de bureau > Timbres de bureau: Timbres d’adresse; Timbres dateurs; Timbres d’estampe; Timbres de notaire; Timbres de passeport; Timbres-poste; Timbres de signature; Timbres vintage
de: Bürobedarf > Büroarbeitsmittel > Bürostempel: Adressstempel; Datumsstempel; Prägestempel; Notarstempel; Passstempel; Briefmarken; Signaturstempel; Vintage-Stempel
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pisarniški pripomočki > Pisarniški žigi: Štampiljke za naslove; Datumske štampiljke; Štampiljke za vtiskovanje; Notarske štampiljke; Štampiljke za potne liste; Poštne znamke; Štampiljke s podpisom; Starinske štampiljke
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 事務用品 > 辦公室印章: 地址印章; 日期印章; 壓凸印章; 公證印章; 護照印章; 郵票; 簽名印章; 復古印章
en: Office Supplies > Office Instruments > Office Stamps: Address Stamps; Date Stamps; Embossing Stamps; Notary Stamps; Passport Stamps; Postage Stamps; Signature Stamps; Vintage Stamps
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > เครื่องมือสำนักงาน > ตราประทับในสำนักงาน: ตราประทับที่อยู่; ตราประทับวันที่; ตราประทับมีลายนูน; ตรารับรองเอกสารโนตารี; ตราประทับหนังสือเดินทาง; สแตมป์; ตราประทับลายเซ็น; ตราประทับแบบวินเทจ
ja: オフィス用品 > 事務用品 > 事務用スタンプ: 住所スタンプ; 日付スタンプ; エンボススタンプ; 公証人押印; パスポートスタンプ; 切手; 署名スタンプ; ヴィンテージスタンプ
nb: Kontormateriell > Kontorinstrumenter > Kontorstempler: Adressestempler; Datostempler; Pregingstempler; Notariustempler; Passstempler; Frimerker; Signaturstempler; Eldre stempler
ko: 사무용품 > 사무기구 > 사무용 도장: 주소 도장; 날짜 도장; 양각 도장; 공증 도장; 여권 도장; 우표; 서명 도장; 빈티지 도장
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Material de escritório > Carimbos de escritório: Carimbos de morada; Carimbos de data; Carimbos brancos; Carimbos notariais; Carimbos de passaporte; Selos de correio; Carimbos de assinatura; Carimbos de correio
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Kantoorbenodigdheden > Kantoorstempels: Adresstempels; Datumstempels; Reliëfstempels; Notarisstempels; Paspoortstempels; Postzegels; Handtekeningstempels; Vintage stempels
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Instrumentos de escritório > Carimbos de escritório: Carimbos de endereço; Carimbos de data; Carimbos em relevo; Carimbos notariais; Carimbos de passaporte; Selos do correio; Carimbos de assinatura; Carimbos antigos
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Uredski uređaji > Uredski pečati: Pečati s adresama; Pečati s datumima; Suhi žig; Pečati za javne bilježnike; Pečati za putovnice; Poštanske marke; Potpisni pečat; Starinske marke